es: Tipo de lápiz: Mecánico; De madera; Otros
en: Pencil type: Mechanical; Wooden; Other
ko: 연필 유형: 기계식; 나무; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta olovke: Mehanički; Drveni; Ostalo
tr: Kurşun Kalem Türü: Mekanik; Ahşap; Diğer
nb: Blyanttype: Mekanisk; Tre; Annet
hu: Ceruza típusa: Mechanikus; Fa; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип молив: Механичен; Дървен; Други
zh-TW: 鉛筆類型: 機械; 木製; 其他
ru: Тип карандаша: Механический; Деревянный; Другой
el: Τύπος μολυβιού: Μηχανικό; Ξύλινο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip creion: Mecanic; De lemn; Altele
da: Blyantstype: Mekanisk; Træ; Andet
de: Bleistifttyp: Mechanisch; Holz; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de lápis: Mecânico; De madeira; Outro
fi: Lyijykynätyyppi: Mekaaninen; Puinen; Muu
zh-CN: 铅笔类型: 机械; 木质; 其他
ja: 鉛筆の種類: メカニカル; 木製; その他
cs: Typ tužky: Mechanický; Dřevěné; Jiné
pl: Typ ołówka: Mechaniczne; Drewno; Inne
nl: Potloodtype: Mechanisch; Houten; Andere
sl-SI: Vrsta svinčnika: Mehansko; Lesen; Drugo
fr: Type de crayon: Mécanique; De bois; Autre
sk-SK: Typ ceruzky: Mechanický; Drevený; Iné
vi: Loại bút chì: Cơ; Bằng gỗ; Khác
sv: Typ av blyertspenna: Mekaniskt; Trä; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de lápis: Mecânica; De madeira; Outro
it: Tipo di matita: Meccanico; Di legno; Altro
lt-LT: Pieštuko tipas: Mechaninis; Medinis; Kita
th: ประเภทดินสอ: แบบกลไก; ดินสอไม้; อื่นๆ